Missouri, session 2026, SB1638.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 1 and 578, RSMo, are amended by adding
thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 1.3060 and
578.251, to read as follows:
1.3060. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, any person authorized by federal law to
inspect, apprehend, examine, detain, or remove aliens in
this country shall not conceal his or her identity as
federal personnel or wear a facial covering that conceals or
obscures his or her facial identity in the performance of
his or her duties, except as expressly authorized in this
section.
2. For purposes of this section, "facial covering"
means any opaque mask, garment, helmet, headgear, or other
item that conceals or obscures the facial identity of an
individual including, but not limited to, a balaclava,
tactical mask, gaiter, ski mask, and any similar type of
facial covering or face-shielding item. A facial covering
does not include any of the following:
(1) A translucent face shield or clear mask that does
not conceal the wearer's facial identity;

SB 1638 2
(2) An N95 medical mask or surgical mask to protect
against transmission of disease or infection, or any other
mask, helmet, or device including, but not limited to, air-
purifying respirators, full or half masks, or self-contained
breathing apparatus necessary to protect against exposure to
any toxin, gas, smoke, inclement weather, or any other
hazardous or harmful environmental condition;
(3) A mask, helmet, or device including, but not
limited to, a self-contained breathing apparatus, necessary
for underwater use;
(4) A motorcycle helmet when worn by an agent
utilizing a motorcycle or other vehicle that requires a
helmet for safe operation while in the performance of their
duties; or
(5) Eyewear necessary to protect from the use of
retinal weapons including, but not limited to, lasers.
3. This section shall not apply to:
(1) Agents performing their duties as undercover
operatives during an active undercover operation or as
needed to protect their identity following the conclusion of
an undercover operation; or
(2) Agents assigned to a Special Response Team (SRT)
while actively performing their SRT responsibilities.
4. A willful and knowing violation of this section is
punishable as a class A misdemeanor.
578.251. 1. Any person authorized by federal law to
inspect, apprehend, examine, detain, or remove aliens in
this country shall not, while in the execution of their
duties, be within one thousand feet of the following
locations:
(1) Any polling place on election day;

SB 1638 3
(2) The facility of any adult or juvenile detention or
correctional institution, prison, or jail;
(3) Any courthouse solely occupied by the circuit,
appellate or supreme court, or any courtrooms,
administrative offices, libraries or other rooms of any such
court whether or not such court solely occupies the building
in question. This subdivision shall also include, but not
be limited to, any juvenile, family, drug, or other court
offices, any room or office wherein any of the courts or
offices listed in this subdivision are temporarily
conducting any business within the jurisdiction of such
courts or offices;
(4) Any meeting of the governing body of a unit of
local government, or any meeting of the general assembly or
a committee of the general assembly;
(5) Any establishment licensed to dispense
intoxicating liquor for consumption on the premises;
(6) Any area of an airport;
(7) Any higher education institution or elementary or
secondary school facility;
(8) Any portion of a building used as a child care
facility;
(9) Any riverboat gambling operation accessible by the
public;
(10) Any gated area of an amusement park;
(11) Any church or other place of religious worship
without the consent of the minister or person or persons
representing the religious organization that exercises
control over the place of religious worship;
(12) Any private property whose owner has posted the
premises as being off-limits to Immigration and Customs
Enforcement Agency or its agents by means of one or more

SB 1638 4
signs displayed in a conspicuous place of a minimum size of
eleven inches by fourteen inches with the writing thereon in
letters of not less than one inch;
(13) Any sports arena or stadium;
(14) Any hospital accessible by the public;
(15) Any library accessible by the public;
2. Any violation of subsection 1 of this section shall
be punishable by fine payable to the county in which the
offense took place as follows:
(1) The federal department or agency responsible for
the action and all offending persons shall each be fined one
thousand dollars for the first offense;
(2) For any subsequent offense, the federal department
or agency responsible for the action and all offending
persons shall each be fined two thousand five hundred
dollars.
✓